Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 9 Foreign Statutory Trusts

386A.9-010.
Foreign statutory trusts.

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign statutory trust governs:

The internal affairs of the trust, including the liability of a beneficial owner as beneficial owner and trustee as trustee for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the trust or a series thereof and the right of a beneficial owner to inspect books and records; and

The enforceability of a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign statutory trust or any series thereof against the property of the trust or the property of or associated with a series.

Each foreign statutory trust is subject to KRS Chapter 14A.

The Secretary of State may not deny a foreign statutory trust a certificate of authority because of any difference between the law of its jurisdiction of formation and the laws of this Commonwealth.

A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign statutory trust to engage in any business or exercise any power that a statutory trust may not engage in or exercise in this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 72, effective July 12, 2012.